Utah statutes.
53-1-108.   Commissioner's powers and duties.
(1)  In addition to the responsibilities contained in this title, the
commissioner shall:
(a)  administer and enforce this title and Title 41, Chapter 12a, Financial
Responsibility of Motor Vehicle Owners and Operators Act;
(b)  appoint deputies, inspectors, examiners, clerical workers, and other
employees as required to properly discharge the duties of the department;
(c)  make rules:
(i)  governing emergency use of signal lights on private vehicles; and
(ii)  allowing privately owned vehicles to be designated for part-time
emergency use, as provided in Section 41-6a-310;
(d)  set standards for safety belt systems, as required by Section 41-6a-1803;
(e)  serve as the chairman of the Disaster Emergency Advisory Council, as
required by Section 63K-3-201;
(f)  designate vehicles as "authorized emergency vehicles," as required by
Section 41-6a-102; and
(g)  on or before January 1, 2003, adopt a written policy that prohibits the
stopping, detention, or search of any person when the action is solely
motivated by considerations of race, color, ethnicity, age, or gender.
(2)  The commissioner may:
(a)  subject to the approval of the governor, establish division headquarters
at various places in the state;
(b)  issue to a special agent a certificate of authority to act as a peace
officer and revoke that authority for cause, as authorized in Section
56-1-21.5;
(c)  create specialized units within the commissioner's office for conducting
internal affairs and aircraft operations as necessary to protect the public
safety;
(d)  cooperate with any recognized agency in the education of the public in
safety and crime prevention and participate in public or private partnerships,
subject to Subsection (3);
(e)  cooperate in applying for and distributing highway safety program funds;
and
(f)  receive and distribute federal funding to further the objectives of
highway safety in compliance with the Federal Assistance Management Program
Act.
(3) (a)  Money may not be expended under Subsection (2)(d) for public safety
education unless it is specifically appropriated by the Legislature for that
purpose.
(b)  Any recognized agency receiving state money for public safety shall file
with the auditor of the state an itemized statement of all its receipts and
expenditures.
